North Dakota statutes. TITLE 63 Weeds
CHAPTER 63-01.1 Noxious Weed Control [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35]

Cross-References.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 4.1-47.

63-01.1-01.
Control and eradication of noxious weeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-03.
State weed control authority — Agriculture commissioner — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-03.1.
County weed board — Jurisdiction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-03.2.
State weed control authority — Agriculture commissioner — Powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-04.
County weed board — Members — Terms — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-04.1.
County weed board — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-04.2.
County weed board — Pest control. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 601, § 38.

63-01.1-04.3.
County weed board — Powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-04.4.
County weed board — Development of county weed list. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-05.
Duties of county weed control officer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-05.1.
Certification of county and city weed control officers — Extension service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-06.
Funding of county programs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-06.1.
Leafy spurge control program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-06.2.
Leafy spurge control program funding. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-06.3.
Leafy spurge mill levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-06.4.
Cannabis control program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-06.5.
Cannabis control program funding. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-06.6.
County weed board — Additional mill levy authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-07.
Special weed control authorities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 651, § 10.

63-01.1-07.1.
City weed board members — Terms — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-07.2.
City weed board — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-07.3.
City weed board — Powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-07.4.
City weed board — Development of city weed list. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-07.5.
Duties of city weed control officer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-07.6.
Funding of city programs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-08.
Entry upon land for noxious weed control or eradication purposes — Notices — Landowner rights — Remedial requirements — Liens — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-09.
County weed board to control or eradicate noxious weeds along county and township roads and highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-10.
Townships to control noxious weeds along township roads. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 638, § 22.

63-01.1-10.1.
Control of noxious weeds within cities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-11.
Landowners or operators along county and township highways to destroy weeds and grasses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 638, § 22.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 63-05.

63-01.1-12.
Preventing dissemination of noxious weeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-12.1.
Quarantine period — Materials or farm products and area defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-12.2.
Weed-free certification — Gravel and sand pits and hay land. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 85, § 2 and S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35 .

63-01.1-13.
Publicly owned land — Noxious weed control or eradication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-13.1.
Noxious weed control on game and fish land. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-14.
Noxious weed control enforcement responsibilities of other agencies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-15.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-16.
Allegations of noncompliance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-17.
Judicial review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 610, § 13.

63-01.1-18.
Investigation by agriculture commissioner — Conflict of interest. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-19.
County weed board — Pest control — Authorization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-20.
County weed control officer — Pest control or eradication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-21.
County weed board — Pest control or eradication — Roads and highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-22.
City weed board — Pest control — Authorization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-23.
City weed control officer — Pest control or eradication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-24.
City weed board — Pest control or eradication — Roads and highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.

63-01.1-25.
Publicly owned land — Pest control or eradication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 35.